en: Clay Pigeon Shooting
xx: Clay Pigeon Shooting
cs: Sportovní střelba
da: Lerdueskydning
de: Tontaubenschießen
es: Tiro al plato
fr: Ball-trap
it: Tiro al piattello
ja: クレー射撃
nl: Kleiduivenschieten
no: Leirdueskyting
pl: Strzelanie do rzutek
pt: Tiro ao prato
ru: Товары для стендовой стрельбы
sv: Lerduveskytte
tr: Trap Atıcılığı

en: Clay Pigeon Throwers
xx: Clay Pigeon Throwers
cs: Vrhače terčů na sportovní střelbu
da: Lerduekastere
de: Tontauben-Wurfmaschinen
es: Máquina de tiro al plato
fr: Machines à lancer les plateaux d'argile
it: Lancia piattelli
ja: クレー標的射出棟
nl: Werpmachine voor kleiduivenschieten
no: Leirduekastere
pl: Wyrzutnie rzutek
pt: Máquinas Lançar Pratos
ru: Машины для запуска тарелочек
sv: Kastmaskiner för lerduvor
tr: Trap Fırlatma Makineleri

en: Clay Pigeons
xx: Clay Pigeons
cs: Terče na sportovní střelbu
da: Lerduer
de: Tontauben
es: Platos para tiro al plato
fr: Plateaux d'argile
it: Piattelli
ja: クレー標的
nl: Kleiduiven
no: Leirduer
pl: Rzutki strzeleckie
pt: Alvo flutuante para tiros
ru: Тарелочки для стендовой стрельбы
sv: Lerduvor
tr: Traplar

en: Hunting
xx: Hunting
cs: Lov
da: Jagt
de: Jagen
es: Caza
fr: Chasse
it: Caccia
ja: 狩猟
nl: Jagen
no: Jakt
pl: Myślistwo
pt: Caça
ru: Товары для охоты
sv: Jakt
tr: Avcılık

en: Animal Traps
xx: Animal Traps
cs: Zvířecí pasti
da: Dyrefælder
de: Tierfallen
es: Trampas para animales
fr: Pièges pour animaux
it: Trappole per animali
ja: 動物捕獲器・罠
nl: Dierenvallen
no: Dyrefeller
pl: Pułapki na zwierzynę
pt: Armadilhas para animais
ru: Капканы
sv: Djurfällor
tr: Hayvan Tuzakları

en: Hearing Enhancers
xx: Hearing Enhancers
cs: Lovecká naslouchátka
da: Hørelsesforbedring
de: Jagdverstärker
es: Audífonos para cazadores
fr: Oreillettes amplificatrices
it: Amplificatori acustici
ja: 狩猟用補聴器
nl: Gehoorverbeteraars
no: Hørselsforsterkere
pl: Wzmacniacze słuchu
pt: Aparelhos auditivos para caça
ru: Наушники с усилителями звука
sv: Hörselförstärkare
tr: Atış Kulaklıkları

en: Hunting Blinds & Screens
xx: Hunting Blinds & Screens
cs: Lovecké přístřešky a zástěny
da: Jagtskjul og camouflagenet
de: Jagdansitze & Tarnung
es: Pantallas y puestos de caza
fr: Postes d'affût de chasse
it: Capanni e paravento da caccia
ja: 狩猟用迷彩ブラインド
nl: Camouflagehutten en -netten
no: Jaktblinds og -skjermer
pl: Osłony myśliwskie
pt: Camuflagem e redes para caça
ru: Охотничья маскировка
sv: Jaktgömslen och skärmar
tr: Av Kamuflaj Kulübe ve Örtüleri

en: Hunting Dog Equipment
xx: Hunting Dog Equipment
cs: Potřeby pro lovecké psy
da: Jagthundeudstyr
de: Jagdhund-Ausrüstung
es: Equipo para perro de caza
fr: Accessoires pour chiens de chasse
it: Attrezzatura per cani da caccia
ja: 狩猟犬用品
nl: Uitrustingen voor jachthonden
no: Jakthundutstyr
pl: Sprzęt dla psów myśliwskich
pt: Equipamentos para cães de caça
ru: Снаряжение для охотничьих собак
sv: Utrustning för jakthundar
tr: Av Köpeği Malzemeleri

en: Tree Stands
xx: Tree Stands
cs: Posedy
da: Jagttårne
de: Hochsitze
es: Puestos para árboles
fr: Postes de chasse
it: Postazioni da albero
ja: 狩猟用ツリースタンド
nl: Hoogzit
no: Trehyller
pl: Ambony
pt: Abrigos em árvores para caça
ru: Лабазы
sv: Trädställningar
tr: Ağaç Tepesi Oturakları

en: Wild Game Feeders
xx: Wild Game Feeders
cs: Krmelce pro zvěř
da: Foderstationer
de: Wildfutterautomaten
es: Comederos para animales de caza
fr: Mangeoires pour le gibier
it: Mangiatoie per animali selvatici
ja: 野生動物用餌箱
nl: Voerbakken voor wild
no: Viltmatere
pl: Karmniki dla dzikiej zwierzyny
pt: Alimentadores para animais selvagens
ru: Кормушки для диких животных
sv: Utfodrare för vilt
tr: Vahşi Hayvan Yemlikleri

en: Wildlife Attractants
xx: Wildlife Attractants
cs: Lovecké atraktanty
da: Vildtlokkemidler
de: Lockmittel für Wild
es: Atrayente para animales
fr: Attractifs pour le gibier
it: Esche per animali selvatici
ja: 野生動物用誘引剤
nl: Lokmiddelen voor wild
no: Jaktluktstoff
pl: Wabiki na zwierzynę
pt: Produtos para atrair animais selvagens
ru: Аттрактанты для диких животных
sv: Lockmedel för vilt
tr: Vahşi Hayvan Tuzak Yemleri

en: Cover Scents & Scent Attractants
xx: Cover Scents & Scent Attractants
cs: Maskovací spreje a pachové atraktanty
da: Duftlokkemidler og færdhæmmende middel
de: Geruchstarnung & Lockdüfte
es: Bloqueadores de olores y aromas atrayentes
fr: Attractants et masquants d'odeur pour chasse
it: Odori attrattivi e neutralizzatori di odori
ja: 臭い消し・誘引剤
nl: Camouflage- en lokgeuren
no: Lokkemidler og odørkontroll
pl: Wabiki i kamuflaże zapachowe
pt: Neutralizadores de odores e odores atrativos
ru: Маскирующие запахи и аттрактанты
sv: Lockmedel
tr: Koku Gizleyiciler ve Çağırma Kokuları

en: Hunting & Wildlife Calls
xx: Hunting & Wildlife Calls
cs: Lovecké vábničky
da: Lokkekald
de: Lockinstrumente
es: Reclamos sonoros para caza y fauna
fr: Appeaux
it: Richiami da caccia
ja: 狩猟用呼び笛
nl: Lokfluiten
no: Lokkefløyter
pl: Wabiki myśliwskie dźwiękowe
pt: Aparelhos que imitam sons de animais
ru: Манки для охоты
sv: Lockpipor
tr: Avcı Düdükleri

en: Hunting & Wildlife Decoys
xx: Hunting & Wildlife Decoys
cs: Lovecké návnady
da: Lokkedyr
de: Jagdköder
es: Señuelos para caza y fauna
fr: Leurres pour la chasse
it: Trappole da caccia
ja: 狩猟用デコイ
nl: Lokmiddelen
no: Lokkedyr og -duer
pl: Wabiki myśliwskie wizualne
pt: Imitação de animais para caça
ru: Приманки для охоты
sv: Jaktbulvaner
tr: Tuzak Yemleri

en: Wildlife Bait\, Feed & Minerals
xx: Wildlife Bait\, Feed & Minerals
cs: Návnady\, krmivo a minerály pro zvěř
da: Lokkemidler\, føde og mineraler til vildt
de: Köder\, Futter & Mineralien
es: Cebo\, alimento y minerales para animales silvestres
fr: Appâts et leurres pour le gibier
it: Esche\, alimenti e minerali per animali selvatici
ja: 野生動物用餌
nl: Lokaas\, voer en mineralen voor wild
no: Lokkemat\, fôr og mineraler til vilt
pl: Przynęta\, karma i odżywki dla dzikiej zwierzyny
pt: Iscas\, rações e suplementos minerais para animais selvagens
ru: Приманка\, корм и минералы для диких животных
sv: Beten\, föda och mineraler för vilt
tr: Vahşi Hayvan Tuzak Yemleri\, Yemleri ve Mineralleri

en: Hunting & Shooting Protective Gear
xx: Hunting & Shooting Protective Gear
cs: Ochranné vybavení na lov a střelbu
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til jagt og skydning
de: Schutzkleidung für Jagd- und Schießsport
es: Equipamiento de protección para caza y tiro
fr: Protection pour la chasse et le tir
it: Protezioni per caccia e tiro a segno
ja: 狩猟・射撃用装備
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor jagen en schieten
no: Verneklær for jakt og skyting
pl: Odzież ochronna myśliwska i strzelecka
pt: Equipamentos de proteção para caça e tiro
ru: Защитная экипировка для охоты и стрельбы
sv: Skyddskläder för jakt och skytte
tr: Avcılık ve Atıcılık Koruyucu Donanımları

en: Hunting & Shooting Gloves
xx: Hunting & Shooting Gloves
cs: Lovecké a střelecké rukavice
da: Jagt- og skydehandsker
de: Handschuhe für Jagd- und Schießsport
es: Guantes de caza y tiro
fr: Gants de chasse et de tir
it: Guanti per caccia e tiro a segno
ja: 狩猟・射撃用グローブ
nl: Jacht- en schiethandschoenen
no: Hansker for jakt og skyting
pl: Rękawice myśliwskie i strzeleckie
pt: Luvas para caça e tiro
ru: Перчатки для охоты и стрельбы
sv: Jakt- och skyttehandskar
tr: Avcılık ve Atıcılık Eldivenleri

en: Hunting & Shooting Jackets
xx: Hunting & Shooting Jackets
cs: Lovecké a střelecké bundy
da: Jagt- og skydejakker
de: Jacken für Jagd- und Schießsport
es: Chaquetas de caza y tiro
fr: Vestes de chasse et de tir
it: Giacche per caccia e tiro a segno
ja: 狩猟・射撃用ジャケット
nl: Jacht- en schietjassen
no: Jakte- og skytejakker
pl: Kurtki myśliwskie i strzeleckie
pt: Jaquetas para caça e tiro
ru: Куртки для охоты и стрельбы
sv: Jakt- och skyttejackor
tr: Avcılık ve Atıcılık Ceketleri

en: Paintball & Airsoft
xx: Paintball & Airsoft
cs: Paintball a airsoft
da: Paintball og airsoft
de: Paintball & Airsoft
es: Paintball y airsoft
fr: Paintball et airsoft
it: Paintball e airsoft
ja: サバイバルゲーム（ペイントボール・エアソフト）
nl: Paintball en airsoft
no: Paintball og airsoft
pl: Paintball i ASG
pt: Paintball e airsoft
ru: Товары для пейнтбола и страйкбола
sv: Paintball och airsoft
tr: Paintball ve Airsoft

en: Airsoft
xx: Airsoft
cs: Airsoft
da: Airsoft
de: Softair
es: Airsoft
fr: Airsoft
it: Airsoft
ja: エアソフト用品
nl: Airsoft
no: Airsoft
pl: ASG
pt: Airsoft
ru: Страйкбол
sv: Airsoft
tr: Airsoft